District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.36

Voting of shares — Quorum.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 193, ch. 269, § 36
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.36.
1981 Ed., § 29-336.
1973 Ed., § 29-916d.